HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1982 N 170
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiň .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşe .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşi .
SFX 1982 0 de .
SFX 1982 0 den .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşim .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimiň .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşime .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimi .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimde .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimden .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiň .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňe .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňi .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňde .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňden .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşi .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiniň .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşine .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşini .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşinde .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşinden .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimiz .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimiziň .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimize .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimizi .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimizde .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimizden .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňiz .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňiziň .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňize .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňizi .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňizde .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňizden .
SFX 1982 0 leri .
SFX 1982 0 leriniň .
SFX 1982 0 lerine .
SFX 1982 0 lerini .
SFX 1982 0 lerinde .
SFX 1982 0 lerinden .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşidirin .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşisiň .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşidir .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşidiris .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşisiňiz .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşidirler .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimdäki .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimdäkiniň .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimdäkä .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimdäkini .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimdäkide .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimdäkiden .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňdäki .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňdäkiniň .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňdäkä .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňdäkini .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňdäkide .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňdäkiden .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşindäki .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşindäkiniň .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşindäkä .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşindäkini .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşindäkide .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşindäkiden .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimizdäki .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimizdäkiniň .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimizdäkä .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimizdäkini .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimizdäkide .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşimizdäkiden .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňizdäki .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňizdäkiniň .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňizdäkä .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňizdäkini .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňizdäkide .
SFX 1982 ýiş ýşiňizdäkiden .
SFX 1982 0 lerindäki .
SFX 1982 0 lerindäkiniň .
SFX 1982 0 lerindäkä .
SFX 1982 0 lerindäkini .
SFX 1982 0 lerindäkide .
SFX 1982 0 lerindäkiden .
SFX 1982 0 li .
SFX 1982 0 siz .
SFX 1982 0 ler .
SFX 1982 0 leriň .
SFX 1982 0 lere .
SFX 1982 0 leri .
SFX 1982 0 lerde .
SFX 1982 0 lerden .
SFX 1982 0 lerdäki .
SFX 1982 0 lerdäkiniň .
SFX 1982 0 lerdäkä .
SFX 1982 0 lerdäkini .
SFX 1982 0 lerdäkide .
SFX 1982 0 lerdäkiden .
SFX 1982 0 lerim .
SFX 1982 0 lerimiň .
SFX 1982 0 lerime .
SFX 1982 0 lerimi .
SFX 1982 0 lerimde .
SFX 1982 0 lerimden .
SFX 1982 0 leriň .
SFX 1982 0 leriňiň .
SFX 1982 0 leriňe .
SFX 1982 0 leriňi .
SFX 1982 0 leriňde .
SFX 1982 0 leriňden .
SFX 1982 0 lerimiz .
SFX 1982 0 lerimiziň .
SFX 1982 0 lerimize .
SFX 1982 0 lerimizi .
SFX 1982 0 lerimizde .
SFX 1982 0 lerimizden .
SFX 1982 0 leriňiz .
SFX 1982 0 leriňiziň .
SFX 1982 0 leriňize .
SFX 1982 0 leriňizi .
SFX 1982 0 leriňizde .
SFX 1982 0 leriňizden .
SFX 1982 0 däki .
SFX 1982 0 däkiniň .
SFX 1982 0 däkä .
SFX 1982 0 däkini .
SFX 1982 0 däkide .
SFX 1982 0 däkiden .
SFX 1982 0 däkiler .
SFX 1982 0 däkileriň .
SFX 1982 0 däkilere .
SFX 1982 0 däkileri .
SFX 1982 0 däkilerde .
SFX 1982 0 däkilerden .
SFX 1982 0 dir .
SFX 1982 0 lerdir .
SFX 1982 0 digim .
SFX 1982 0 digimiň .
SFX 1982 0 digime .
SFX 1982 0 digimi .
SFX 1982 0 digimde .
SFX 1982 0 digimden .
SFX 1982 0 digiň .
SFX 1982 0 digiňiň .
SFX 1982 0 digiňe .
SFX 1982 0 digiňi .
SFX 1982 0 digiňde .
SFX 1982 0 digiňden .
SFX 1982 0 digi .
SFX 1982 0 diginiň .
SFX 1982 0 digine .
SFX 1982 0 digini .
SFX 1982 0 diginde .
SFX 1982 0 diginden .
SFX 1982 0 digimiz .
SFX 1982 0 digimiziň .
SFX 1982 0 digimize .
SFX 1982 0 digimizi .
SFX 1982 0 digimizde .
SFX 1982 0 digimizden .
SFX 1982 0 digiňiz .
SFX 1982 0 digiňiziň .
SFX 1982 0 digiňize .
SFX 1982 0 digiňizi .
SFX 1982 0 digiňizde .
SFX 1982 0 digiňizden .
SFX 1982 0 dikleri .
SFX 1982 0 dikleriniň .
SFX 1982 0 diklerine .
SFX 1982 0 diklerini .
SFX 1982 0 diklerinde .
SFX 1982 0 diklerinden .
