HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.dic
belleýiş/1982
döreýiş/1982
ereýiş/1982
hödürleýiş/1982
isleýiş/1982
işleýiş/1982
ölçeýiş/1982
sözleýiş/1982
terbiýeleýiş/1982
täzeleýiş/1982
ýöreýiş/1982
ýükleýiş/1982
